huv.lexc
Multichar_Symbols

%<n%>                ! Nombre
%<v%>                ! Verbo
%<a%>                ! Adjetivo
%<det%>                ! Determinante
%<col%>              ! Colectivo
%<pl%>               ! Plural
%>                   ! Frontera de morfema

!!!!Archiphonemas
%{e%}

%{I%}
%{r%}

@U.S_PRS.3@
@U.S_PRS.2@
@R.S_PRS@

! (COLECTIVO) - RAIZ
! RAIZ
! DET - (PL)
LEXICON Root

Colectivo    ;
Determinante ;
Adjetivos ;
Prefijos ; 
Nombres ;
Verbos ;

LEXICON Prefijos 

@U.S_PRS.2@:@U.S_PRS.2@i%{r%}%> Verbos ; 
@U.S_PRS.3@:@U.S_PRS.3@a%> Verbos ; 

LEXICON AGR 

@U.S_PRS.2@%<s_pl2%>:@U.S_PRS.2@%>%{I%}n # ;
@U.S_PRS.3@%<s_pl3%>:@U.S_PRS.3@%>%{I%}w # ;

LEXICON FLEXION-VERBAL 

@R.S_PRS@:@R.S_PRS@ AGR ; 

LEXICON V-TV

FLEXION-VERBAL ; 

LEXICON V-IV 

FLEXION-VERBAL ; 

LEXICON Colectivo

%<col%>:%>mon Nombres-Humanos ; ! "Colectivo"
Nombres-Humanos ;

LEXICON Plural
%<pl%>:%>üw #; ! "Plural"
# ;

LEXICON Nombres-Humanos
ndok%<n%>:ndok # ; ! “Pescador”

LEXICON Nombres
pet%<n%>:pet # ; ! “Perro”
jow%<n%>:jow # ; ! “Hamaca”
müx%<n%>:müx # ; ! “Cayuco”

LEXICON Verbos

!xomb%<v%>:xomb # ; ! "Encontrar"
!jaw%<v%>:jaw # ; ! "Ver"
!mb%<v%>:mb # ; ! "Ir"
!joj%<v%>:joj # ; ! "Toser"
ndyak%<v%>%<iv%>:ndyak V-IV ; ! "hablar"
ngal%<v%>%<iv%>:ngal V-TV  ; ! "comprar"
mb%<v%>%<iv%>:mb V-IV  ; ! "it"
w%<v%>%<iv%>:w V-IV  ; ! "salir"
xeeb%<v%>%<iv%>:xe%{e%}b V-IV; ! "bañarse"

LEXICON Adjetivos
napat%<adj%>:napat # ; ! "Bravo"
napak%<adj%>:napak # ; ! "Duro"
naxix%<adj%>:naxix # ; ! "Sabroso"
nambeor%<adj%>:nambeor # ; ! "Negro"


LEXICON Determinante
aaga%<det%>:aaga Plural ; ! "El"
